Illinois, session 104th, HB4548.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 155 and by adding Section 154.11 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/154.11 new)7    Sec. 154.11. Immunity from liability.8    (a) If the insurer tenders the lesser of the policy limits 9or the amount demanded by the claimant in a statutory or common 10law action alleging bad faith within 90 days after receiving 11actual notice of a claim accompanied by sufficient evidence to 12support the amount of the claim, no liability may be imposed 13against the insurer. If the insurer fails to tender the limits 14or amount within 90 days, then the fact that the insurer could 15have done so but did not is inadmissible in an action to 16establish bad faith. If the insurer fails to tender that 17amount within 90 days, then the statute of limitations is 18extended for an additional 90 days.19    (b) In any statutory or common law action alleging bad 20faith, mere negligence alone is insufficient to constitute bad 21faith. The insured, claimant, and representative of the 22insured or claimant have a duty to act in good faith in 23furnishing information regarding the claim, in making demands   HB4548- 2 -LRB104 17835 JRC 31269 b1of the insurer, in setting deadlines, and in attempting to 2settle the claim. This duty does not create a separate cause of 3action. In any action for bad faith against an insurer, the 4trier of fact may consider whether the insured, claimant, or 5representative of the insured or claimant did not act in good 6faith under this subsection, in which case the trier of fact 7may reasonably reduce the amount of damages awarded against 8the insurer.9    (c) If 3 or more third-party claimants have competing 10claims arising out of a single occurrence, which in total may 11exceed the available policy limits of one or more of the 12insured parties who may be liable to the third-party 13claimants, an insurer is not liable beyond the available 14policy limits for failure to pay all or any portion of the 15available policy limits to one or more of the third-party 16claimants if, within 90 days after receiving notice of the 17competing claims in excess of the available policy limits, the 18insurer:19        (1) files an interpleader action under the Code of 20    Civil Procedure. If the claims of the competing 21    third-party claimants are found to be in excess of the 22    policy limits, the third-party claimants are entitled to a 23    prorated share of the policy limits as determined by the 24    trier of fact. An insurer's interpleader action does not 25    alter or amend the insurer's obligation to defend its 26    insured.  HB4548- 3 -LRB104 17835 JRC 31269 b1        (2) Makes the entire amount of the policy limits 2    available for payment to the competing third-party 3    claimants before a qualified arbitrator agreed to by the 4    insurer and third-party claimants at the expense of the 5    insurer. The third-party claimants are entitled to a 6    prorated share of the policy limits as determined by the 7    arbitrator, who must consider the comparative fault, if 8    any, of each third-party claimant, and the total likely 9    outcome at trial based upon the total of the economic and 10    noneconomic damages submitted to the arbitrator for 11    consideration. A third-party claimant whose claim is 12    resolved by the arbitrator must execute and deliver a 13    general release to the insured party whose claim is 14    resolved by the proceeding. 15    (215 ILCS 5/155)  (from Ch. 73, par. 767)16    Sec. 155. Attorney fees. 17    (1) In any action by or against a company wherein there is 18in issue the liability of a company on a policy or policies of 19insurance or the amount of the loss payable thereunder, or for 20an unreasonable delay in settling a claim, and it appears to 21the court that such action or delay is vexatious and 22unreasonable, the court may allow as part of the taxable costs 23in the action reasonable attorney fees, as determined by the 24lodestar fee method of multiplying the number of hours 25reasonably spent on a case by a reasonable hourly rate,   HB4548- 4 -LRB104 17835 JRC 31269 b1adjusted up or down by a multiplier to account for factors such 2as the quality of the work, complexity of the case, or risk of 3loss. This presumption of using the lodestar method may be 4overcome only in a rare and exceptional circumstance with 5evidence that competent counsel could not otherwise be 6retained. other costs, plus an amount not to exceed any one of 7the following amounts: 8        (a) 60% of the amount which the court or jury finds 9    such party is entitled to recover against the company, 10    exclusive of all costs; 11        (b) $60,000; 12        (c) the excess of the amount which the court or jury 13    finds such party is entitled to recover, exclusive of 14    costs, over the amount, if any, which the company offered 15    to pay in settlement of the claim prior to the action.16    (2) Where there are several policies insuring the same 17insured against the same loss whether issued by the same or by 18different companies, the court may fix the amount of the 19allowance so that the total attorney fees on account of one 20loss shall not be increased by reason of the fact that the 21insured brings separate suits on such policies.22    (3) If a named insured, omnibus insured, or named 23beneficiary is awarded a declaratory judgment in an action in 24State or federal court to determine insurance coverage after 25the insurer has made a total coverage denial of a claim, the 26court must award reasonable attorney's fees to the named   HB4548- 5 -LRB104 17835 JRC 31269 b1insured, omnibus insured, or named beneficiary who has 2prevailed in the action. This right may not be transferred to, 3assigned to, or acquired in any other manner by anyone other 4than a named insured, omnibus insured, or named beneficiary. A 5defense offered by an insurer under a reservation of rights 6does not constitute a denial of coverage claim. The attorney's 7fees are limited to those incurred in the action brought under 8this Code for declaratory relief to determine coverage of 9insurance issued under this Code. This Section does not apply 10to any action arising under a residential or commercial 11property insurance policy. 12(Source: P.A. 93-485, eff. 1-1-04.) 13    Section 10. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 14changing Section 2-1117 and by adding Part 30 to Article VIII 15as follows: 16    (735 ILCS 5/2-1117)  (from Ch. 110, par. 2-1117)17    Sec. 2-1117. Joint liability. Except as provided in 18Section 2-1118, in actions on account of bodily injury or 19death or physical damage to property, based on negligence, or 20product liability based on strict tort liability, all 21defendants found liable are jointly and severally liable for 22plaintiff's past and future medical and medically related 23expenses. Any defendant whose fault, as determined by the 24trier of fact, is less than 50% 25% of the total fault of all   HB4548- 6 -LRB104 17835 JRC 31269 b1tortfeasors, including, but not limited to, the plaintiff's 2employer, nonparties, entities that have settled, or any other 3person that the trier of fact finds was at fault and a 4proximate cause of the injury or damage for which recovery is 5sought by attributable to the plaintiff, the defendants sued 6by the plaintiff, and any third party defendant except the 7plaintiff's employer, shall be severally liable for all other 8damages. Any defendant whose fault, as determined by the trier 9of fact, is 50% 25% or greater of the total fault of all 10tortfeasors, including, but not limited to, the plaintiff's 11employer, nonparties, entities that have settled, or any other 12person that the trier of fact finds was at fault and a 13proximate cause of the injury or damage for which recovery is 14sought by the plaintiff attributable to the plaintiff, the 15defendants sued by the plaintiff, and any third party 16defendants except the plaintiff's employer, shall be jointly 17and severally liable for all other damages.18    The changes to this Section made by this amendatory Act of 19the 104th General Assembly apply to actions filed on or after 20the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 21Assembly. 22(Source: P.A. 93-10, eff. 6-4-03; 93-12, eff. 6-4-03.) 23    (735 ILCS 5/Art. VIII Pt. 30 heading new)24Part 30. Medical Expenses   HB4548- 7 -LRB104 17835 JRC 31269 b1    (735 ILCS 5/8-3001 new)2    Sec. 8-3001. Medical expenses.3    (a) Definitions. As used in this Section:4    "Factoring company" means a person that purchases health 5care provider's accounts receivable at a discount below the 6invoice value of the accounts.7    "Health care coverage" means any third-party health care 8or disability services financing arrangement, including, but 9not limited to, arrangements with entities certified or 10authorized under federal law or under the Illinois Insurance 11Code, State or federal health care benefit programs, workers' 12compensation, and personal injury protection.13    "Health care provider" means any of the following: a 14health care facility or health care practitioner as defined 15under Section 8-2001 of this Code; clinical laboratory 16providing services in this State or services to health care 17providers in this State, if the clinical laboratory is 18certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services 19under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments 20and the federal rules adopted thereunder; a federally 21qualified health center as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1396d(l)(2)(B) 22as that definition existed on the effective date of this 23amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly; and a pharmacy 24as defined under the Pharmacy Practice Act of 1987.25    "Letter of protection" means any arrangement by which a 26health care provider renders treatment in exchange for a   HB4548- 8 -LRB104 17835 JRC 31269 b1promise of payment for the claimant's medical expenses from 2any judgment or settlement of a personal injury or wrongful 3death action. This includes any such arrangement, regardless 4of whether referred to as a letter of protection.5    (b) Admissible evidence of medical treatment or service 6expenses. Evidence offered to prove the amount of damages for 7past or future medical treatment or services in a personal 8injury or wrongful death action is admissible as provided in 9this subsection.10        (1) Evidence offered to prove the amount of damages 11    for past medical treatment or services that have been 12    satisfied is limited to evidence of the amount actually 13    paid regardless of the source of payment.14        (2) Evidence offered to prove the amount necessary to 15    satisfy unpaid charges for incurred medical treatment or 16    services shall include, but is not limited to, evidence as 17    provided in this paragraph.18            (A) If the claimant has health care coverage other 19        than Medicare or Medicaid, evidence of the amount the 20        health care coverage is obligated to pay the health 21        care provider to satisfy the charges for the 22        claimant's incurred medical treatment or services, 23        plus the claimant's share of medical expenses under 24        the insurance contract or regulation.25            (B) If the claimant has health care coverage but 26        obtains treatment under a letter of protection or   HB4548- 9 -LRB104 17835 JRC 31269 b1        otherwise does not submit charges for any health care 2        provider's medical treatment or services to health 3        care coverage, evidence of the amount the claimant's 4        health care coverage would pay the health care 5        provider to satisfy the past unpaid medical charges 6        under the insurance contract or regulation, plus the 7        claimant's share of medical expenses under the 8        insurance contract or regulation, if the claimant 9        obtained medical services or treatment under the 10        health care coverage.11            (C) If the claimant does not have health care 12        coverage or has health care coverage through Medicare 13        or Medicaid, evidence of 120% of the Medicare 14        reimbursement rate in effect on the date of the 15        claimant's incurred medical treatment or services, or, 16        if there is no applicable Medicare rate for a service, 17        170% of the applicable State Medicaid rate.18            (D) If the claimant obtains medical treatment or 19        services under a letter of protection and the health 20        care provider later transfers the right to receive 21        payment under the letter of protection to a third 22        party, evidence of the amount the third party paid or 23        agreed to pay the health care provider in exchange for 24        the right to receive payment under the letter of 25        protection.26            (E) Any evidence of reasonable amounts billed to   HB4548- 10 -LRB104 17835 JRC 31269 b1        the claimant for medically necessary treatment or 2        medically necessary services provided to the claimant.3        (3) Evidence offered to prove the amount of damages 4    for any future medical treatment or services the claimant 5    will receive includes, but is not limited to, evidence as 6    provided in this paragraph.7            (A) If the claimant has health care coverage other 8        than Medicare or Medicaid or is eligible for any such 9        health care coverage, evidence of the amount for which 10        the future charges of health care providers could be 11        satisfied if submitted to the health care coverage, 12        plus the claimant's share of medical expenses under 13        the insurance contract or regulation.14            (B) If the claimant does not have health care 15        coverage or has health care coverage through Medicare 16        or Medicaid, or is eligible for the health care 17        coverage, evidence of 120% of the Medicare 18        reimbursement rate in effect at the time of trial for 19        the medical treatment or services the claimant will 20        receive, or, if there is no applicable Medicare rate 21        for a service, 170% of the applicable state Medicaid 22        rate.23            (C) Any evidence of reasonable future amounts to 24        be billed to the claimant for medically necessary 25        treatment or medically necessary services.26        (4) This subsection does not impose an affirmative   HB4548- 11 -LRB104 17835 JRC 31269 b1    duty upon any party to seek a reduction in billed charges 2    to which the party is not contractually entitled.3        (5) Individual contracts between providers and 4    authorized commercial insurers or authorized health 5    maintenance organizations are not subject to discovery or 6    disclosure and are not admissible into evidence.7    (c) Letters of protection; required disclosures. In a 8personal injury or wrongful death action, as a condition 9precedent to asserting any claim for medical expenses for 10treatment rendered under a letter of protection, the claimant 11must disclose:12        (1) A copy of the letter of protection.13        (2) All billings for the claimant's medical expenses, 14    which must be itemized and, to the extent applicable, 15    coded according to:16            (A) For health care providers billing at the 17        provider level, the American Medical Association's 18        Current Procedural Terminology (CPT) or the Healthcare 19        Common Procedure Coding System (HCPCS) in effect on 20        the date the services were rendered.21            (B) For health care providers billing at the 22        facility level for expenses incurred in a clinical or 23        outpatient setting, including when billing through an 24        Ambulatory Payment Classification (APC) or Enhanced 25        Ambulatory Patient Grouping (EAPG); the International 26        Classification of Diseases (ICD) diagnosis code and,   HB4548- 12 -LRB104 17835 JRC 31269 b1        if applicable, the American Medical Association's 2        Current Procedural Terminology (CPT) in effect on the 3        date the services were rendered.4            (C) For health care providers billing at the 5        facility level for expenses incurred in an inpatient 6        setting, including when billing through a Diagnosis 7        Related Group (DRG); the International Classification 8        of Diseases (ICD) diagnosis and procedure codes in 9        effect on the date in which the claimant is 10        discharged.11        (3) If the health care provider sells the accounts 12    receivable for the claimant's medical expenses to a 13    factoring company or other third party:14            (A) The name of the factoring company or other 15        third party who purchased the accounts.16            (B) The dollar amount for which the factoring 17        company or other third party purchased the accounts, 18        including any discount provided below the invoice 19        amount.20        (4) Whether the claimant, at the time medical 21    treatment was rendered, had health care coverage and, if 22    so, the identity of the coverage.23        (5) Whether the claimant was referred for treatment 24    under a letter of protection and, if so, the identity of 25    the person who made the referral. If the referral is made 26    by the claimant's attorney, disclosure of the referral is   HB4548- 13 -LRB104 17835 JRC 31269 b1    permitted, and evidence of the referral is admissible. The 2    financial relationship between a law firm and a medical 3    provider, including the number of referrals, frequency, 4    and financial benefit obtained, is relevant to the issue 5    of the bias of a testifying medical provider.6    (d) Damages recoverable for medical treatment or service 7expenses. The damages that may be recovered by a claimant in a 8personal injury or wrongful death action for the reasonable 9and necessary cost or value of medical care rendered may not 10include any amount in excess of the evidence of medical 11treatment and services expenses admitted under subsection (b), 12and also may not exceed the sum of the following:13        (1) amounts actually paid by or on behalf of the 14    claimant to a health care provider who rendered medical 15    treatment or services;16        (2) amounts necessary to satisfy charges for medical 17    treatment or services that are due and owing but at the 18    time of trial are not yet satisfied; and19        (3) amounts necessary to provide for any reasonable 20    and necessary medical treatment or services the claimant 21    will receive in the future. 22    Section 15. The Premises Liability Act is amended by 23adding Sections 5.1 and 5.2 as follows: 24    (740 ILCS 130/5.1 new)  HB4548- 14 -LRB104 17835 JRC 31269 b1    Sec. 5.1. Premises liability for criminal acts of third 2parties. In an action for damages against the owner, lessor, 3operator, or manager of commercial or real property brought by 4a person lawfully on the property who was injured by the 5criminal act of a third party, the trier of fact must consider 6the fault of all persons who contributed to the injury. 7    (740 ILCS 130/5.2 new)8    Sec. 5.2. Multifamily residential property safety and 9security.10    (a) As used in this Section:11    "Multifamily residential property" means a residential 12building, or group of residential buildings, such as 13apartments, townhouses, or condominiums, consisting of at 14least 5 dwelling units on a particular parcel.15    "Parcel" means real property for which a distinct parcel 16identification number is assigned to the property by the 17property appraiser for the county in which the property is 18located.19    (b) The owner or principal operator of a multifamily 20residential property that substantially implements the 21following security measures on that property has a presumption 22against liability in connection with criminal acts that occur 23on the premises that are committed by third parties who are not 24employees or agents of the owner or operator:25        (1) A security camera system at points of entry and   HB4548- 15 -LRB104 17835 JRC 31269 b1    exit that records and maintains video footage that is 2    retrievable for at least 30 days to assist in offender 3    identification and apprehension.4        (2) A lighted parking lot illuminated at an intensity 5    of at least an average of 1.8 foot-candles per square foot 6    at 18 inches above the surface from dusk until dawn or 7    controlled by photocell or any similar electronic device 8    that provides light from dusk until dawn.9        (3) Lighting in walkways, laundry rooms, common areas, 10    and porches. The lighting must be illuminated from dusk 11    until dawn or controlled by photocell or any similar 12    electronic device that provides light from dusk until 13    dawn.14        (4) At least a one-inch deadbolt in each dwelling unit 15    door.16        (5) A locking device on each window, each exterior 17    sliding door, and any other doors not used for community 18    purposes.19        (6) Locked gates with key or fob access along pool 20    fence areas.21        (7) A peephole or door viewer on each dwelling unit 22    door that does not include a window or that does not have a 23    window next to the door.24    (c) By January 1, 2028, the owner or principal operator of 25a multifamily residential property must provide proper crime 26deterrence and safety training to its current employees. After   HB4548- 16 -LRB104 17835 JRC 31269 b1January 1, 2028, the owner or principal operator must provide 2this training to an employee within 60 days after the hiring 3date for purposes of this paragraph. For purposes of this 4subsection, "proper crime deterrence and safety training" 5means training that trains and familiarizes employees with the 6security principles, devices, measures, and standards set 7forth under subsection (b), and that is reviewed at least 8every 3 years and updated as necessary. The owner or principal 9operator may request a law enforcement agency to review the 10training curriculum.11    (d) For purposes of establishing the presumption against 12liability under subsection (b), the burden of proof is on the 13owner or principal operator to demonstrate that the owner or 14principal operator has substantially implemented the security 15measures specified in subsection (b).16    (e) This Section does not establish a private cause of 17action. 18    Section 97. This Act may not be construed to impair any 19right under an insurance contract in effect on or before the 20effective date of this Act. To the extent that this Act affects 21a right under an insurance contract, this Act applies to an 22insurance contract issued or renewed after the effective date 23of this Act. 24    Section 98. Except as otherwise expressly provided in   HB4548- 17 -LRB104 17835 JRC 31269 b1Section 10, this Act applies to all actions filed on or after 2the effective date of this Act.  3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.  HB4548- 18 -LRB104 17835 JRC 31269 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    215 ILCS 5/154.11 new4    215 ILCS 5/155from Ch. 73, par. 7675    735 ILCS 5/2-1117from Ch. 110, par. 2-11176    735 ILCS 5/Art. VIII Pt. 7    30 heading new8    735 ILCS 5/8-3001 new9    740 ILCS 130/5.1 new10    740 ILCS 130/5.2 new